Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 3 Precincts Using Voting Machines

Administrative rules and regulations.

Voting Machines—Voting Recorders, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Subject 183-1-12.

21-2-450.
Opening of polls; procedure when ballot labels misplaced; certification by managers; machines to be locked until polls open; officers to be near machines; inspection of machines; broken machines.

In the precincts in which voting machines are used, the seals of the package furnished by the superintendent shall be publicly broken at the opening of the polls and such package shall be opened by the chief manager. One card of instructions, one notice of penalties, one voting rights poster, and not less than two diagrams of the face of the machine shall be immediately posted in or about the voting room outside the enclosed space; and such cards, notices of penalties, and voting rights posters shall be given to any elector at his or her request, so long as there are any on hand.

The managers, before opening the envelope containing the keys which unlock the operating mechanism and registering counters or counter compartment of the voting machine, shall examine the number of the seal on the machine and the number registered on the protective counter or device and shall see whether they are the same as the numbers written on the envelope containing the keys. If either number shall be found not to agree, the envelope shall remain unopened until the poll officers shall have notified the proper custodian of voting machines or the superintendent and until the custodian or some other person authorized by the superintendent shall have presented himself or herself at the polling place for the purpose of reexamining the machine and shall have certified that it is properly arranged. But, if the numbers on the seal and the protective counter or device shall both be found to agree with the numbers on the envelope, the envelope shall be opened, and where the voting machine provided is not equipped with a mechanism for printing paper proof sheets, the poll officers shall examine the registering counters and, for that purpose, shall open the doors concealing such counter, if the construction of the voting machine shall so require; and, before the polls are opened, each manager shall carefully examine every counter and shall see that it registers zero. When the voting machine provided is equipped with a mechanism for printing paper proof sheets and requires the simultaneous use of three keys to unlock the registering counters or counter compartment, the chief manager shall deliver one of the two keys to an assistant manager, to be retained by him or her, and shall then print at least two proof sheets, one of which each manager shall carefully examine to ascertain whether every counter registers zero and shall then preserve such proof sheets to be signed by them and returned to the superintendent, with the duplicate return sheet, and shall sign and post the other proof sheet upon the wall of the polling place, where it shall remain until the polls are closed. The key delivered by the chief manager to such assistant manager, as provided in this paragraph, shall be retained by him or her until the polls have been closed; and the voting and counting mechanism of the machine shall have been locked and sealed against voting and shall then be returned to the chief manager, for return by him or her to the superintendent, as provided in this part.

If the ballot labels containing the names of officers, political parties and bodies, candidates, and questions shall not be in their proper places on the voting machine, the poll officers shall immediately notify the proper custodian of voting machines or the superintendent, and the machine shall not be used until the custodian or some other person authorized by the superintendent shall have supplied ballot labels as provided in this subsection. If the ballot labels for a voting machine shall not be delivered at the time required or, if after delivery, they shall be lost, destroyed, or stolen, the superintendent or custodian shall cause other ballot labels to be prepared, printed, or written, as nearly in the form of the official ballot labels as practicable, and shall cause such ballot labels to be used in the same manner, as nearly as may be, as the official ballot labels would have been used.

The managers shall sign a certificate showing:

The identifying number or other designation of the voting machine;

The delivery of the keys in a sealed envelope;

The number on the seal upon the machine;

The number registered on the protective counter or device;

That all the counters were set at zero; and

That the ballot labels are properly placed in the machine,

which certificate shall be returned by the chief manager to the superintendent with the other certificates, as provided in this part.

The machine shall remain locked against voting until the polls are opened and shall not be operated except by electors in voting. If any counter is found not to register zero, the poll officers shall immediately notify the custodian or the superintendent, who shall, if practicable, adjust or cause the counters to be adjusted at zero; but, if it shall be found impracticable for the custodian or other person authorized by the superintendent to arrive in time so as to adjust such counters before the time set for opening the polls, the poll officers shall immediately make a written record of the designation or designating letter or number of such counter, together with the number registered thereon (called the initial number below) and shall sign and post the same upon the wall of the polling place, where it shall remain until the polls are closed; provided, however, that if the voting machine used is equipped with a mechanism for printing paper proof sheets, in any case where any counter is shown by such proof sheet not to register zero, if it shall be found impracticable to have such counter adjusted before the time set for opening the polls, the poll officer shall sign such printed proof sheet and post the same upon the wall of the polling place where it shall remain until the polls are closed; and, in filling out the returns of the election, if the final number of such counter is greater than the initial number, the poll officers shall subtract the initial number from the final number and enter the difference on the returns as the vote for the candidate or on the question represented by such counter; if the final number of such counter is less than the initial number, the poll officers shall add 1,000 to the final number, shall subtract the initial number from the sum so ascertained, and shall enter upon the returns as the vote for the candidate or on the question represented by such counter the final plus 1,000 less the initial number.

The exterior of the voting machine and every part of the polling place shall be in plain view of the poll officers. The voting machine shall be located at the polling place, at least six feet back of the guardrail or barrier, in such a position that, unless its construction shall require otherwise, the ballot labels on the face of the machine can be seen plainly by the poll officers when the machine is not occupied by an elector.

The poll officers shall not themselves be, nor allow any other person to be, in any position that will permit anyone to see or ascertain how an elector votes or how he or she has voted. A poll officer shall inspect the face of the machine at least once every hour during the time when the polls are open to see that the ballot labels are in their proper places and that the machine has not been damaged or tampered with.

If during the primary or election a voting machine becomes inoperative in such manner that it cannot be readily repaired without exposing the count on the candidate counters, the poll officer shall immediately lock and seal the operating lever or mechanism of the machine so that the voting and counting mechanism will be prevented from operation. Upon the close of the polls, the poll officers shall perform their duties set forth in Code Sections 21-2-454 through 21-2-457 with respect to such machine. If necessary, because of the lack of another machine or other machines for use by the electors, after a voting machine becomes inoperative, paper ballots shall be used.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1327, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 30; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 9; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 29; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 62/HB 244; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467.

21-2-451.
Execution of voter’s certificate; procedure upon qualification of elector; elector unable to sign name; voting outside of precinct of residence; registration prerequisite to voting.

At every primary and election, each elector who desires to vote shall first execute a voter’s certificate and hand the same to the poll officer in charge of the electors list. When an elector has been found entitled to vote, the poll officer who examined his or her voter’s certificate shall sign his or her name or initials on the voter’s certificate and shall, if the voter’s signature is not readily legible, print such voter’s name under his or her signature. As each elector is found to be qualified and votes, the poll officers shall check off the elector’s name on the electors list and shall enter the number of the stub of the ballot issued to him or her, or his or her number in the order of admission to the voting machines, on the voter’s certificate of such elector. As each elector votes, his or her name in the order of voting shall be recorded in the numbered list of voters provided for that purpose.

If any elector was unable to sign his or her name at the time of registration or, if having been able to sign his or her name when registered, he or she subsequently shall have become, through physical disability, unable to sign his or her name when he or she applies to vote, he or she shall establish his or her identity to the satisfaction of the poll officers; and in such case he or she shall not be required to sign a voter’s certificate, but a certificate shall be prepared for him or her by a poll officer.

Except as provided in Code Sections 21-2-218 and 21-2-386, no person shall vote at any primary or election at any polling place outside the precinct in which such person resides, nor shall such person vote in the precinct in which such person resides unless such person has been registered as an elector and such person’s name appears on the electors list of such precinct.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1310, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1328, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 888, § 8/HB 1435.

Cross references.

Penalty for voting by unqualified elector, §

21-2-571

.

21-2-452.
Admission of electors to enclosed space; voting procedure generally; procedure as to write-in votes; voting by electors whose right to vote is challenged; disabled voters.

No elector shall enter the enclosed space behind the guardrail provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-267 until he or she is found entitled to vote, after which he or she shall be admitted to the voting machine booth as soon as it is vacant and shall be permitted to vote.

At primaries, before an elector is admitted to the voting machine, it shall be adjusted by the poll officer in charge thereof so that such elector will only be able to vote for the candidates of the party in whose primary he or she is then participating.

At primaries or elections, an elector shall vote for each candidate individually by operating the key, handle, pointer, or knob upon or adjacent to which the name of such candidate is placed. In the case of a question submitted to the vote of the electors, the elector shall operate the key, handle, pointer, or knob corresponding to the answer which he or she desires to give.

An elector may, at any election, vote for any person for any office, for which office his or her name does not appear upon the voting machine as a candidate, by a write-in ballot containing the name of such person, such ballot to be deposited, written, or affixed (but not by the use of a sticker or paster) in or upon the appropriate receptacle or device provided in or on the machine for that purpose, and in no other manner. Where two or more persons are to be elected to the same office and the names of such candidates are placed upon or adjacent to a single key, handle, pointer, or knob, and the voting machine requires that all write-in ballots voted for that office be deposited, written, or affixed in or upon a single receptacle or device, an elector may vote in or by such receptacle or device for one or more persons whose names do not appear upon the machine, with or without the name of one or more persons whose names do so appear. With these exceptions, no write-in ballot shall be cast on a voting machine for any person for any office if the person’s name appears on the machine as a candidate for that office, and any ballot so cast shall be void and not counted. No elector shall be permitted to cast a write-in ballot in a municipal primary.

At any general election at which presidential electors are to be chosen, each elector shall be permitted to vote by one operation for all the presidential electors of a political party or body. For each party or body nominating presidential electors, a ballot label shall be provided containing only the words “Presidential Electors,” preceded by the name of the party or body and followed by the names of the candidates thereof for the office of President and Vice President, and the corresponding counter or registering device shall register votes cast for such presidential electors when thus voted for collectively. If an elector desires to vote a ticket for presidential electors made up of the names of persons nominated by different parties or bodies, or partially of names of persons so in nomination and partially of names of persons not in nomination by any party or body, or wholly of names of persons not in nomination by any party or body, he or she may write or deposit a paper ballot prepared by himself or herself in the receptacle provided in or on the machine for the purpose. The machine shall be so constructed that it will not be possible for any one elector to vote a straight party or body ticket for presidential electors and at the same time to deposit a ballot for presidential electors in such receptacle. When the votes for presidential electors are counted, the votes appearing upon the counter or registering device corresponding to the ballot label containing the names of the candidates for President and Vice President of any party or body shall be counted as votes for each of the candidates for presidential elector of such party or body; and thereupon all candidates for presidential elector shall be credited, in addition, with the votes cast for them upon the ballots deposited in the machine, as provided in this Code section.

As soon as the elector has adjusted the voting machine so that it will record his or her choice for the various candidates to be voted for and his or her answers to the various questions are submitted, he or she shall operate the recording mechanism and immediately leave the voting machine booth.

If an elector’s right to vote has been challenged pursuant to Code Section 21-2-230, the elector shall not be permitted to vote on the voting machine but shall vote by ballot in the manner prescribed by this chapter.

The superintendent shall make paper ballots available for disabled electors who, due to their disability, are unable to vote on a voting machine. Absentee ballots may be used for this purpose. The superintendent shall provide sufficient accommodations to permit such disabled elector to vote in private.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1315, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 851, § 8; Code 1933, § 34-1330, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, §§ 14, 14a; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 18; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 279, § 9; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 9; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, §§ 13, 14; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Use of absentee ballots when voting machines are inaccessible, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.10.

21-2-453.
Voter’s certificate binder as constituting official list; separate preservation and return of refused applications.

After each elector has been admitted to vote, his or her voter’s certificate shall be inserted in the binder provided therefor and known as the “voter’s certificate binder.” Such voter’s certificates so bound shall constitute the official list of electors voting at such primary or election. All voter’s certificates prepared by persons applying to vote whose applications to vote are refused by the poll officers shall be separately preserved and returned to the superintendent with the other papers.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 429, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1329, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 33; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-454.
Duties of poll officers after the close of the polls.

As soon as the polls are closed and the last elector has voted, the poll officers shall immediately lock and seal the operating lever or mechanism of the machine so that the voting and counting mechanism will be prevented from operation, and they shall then sign a certificate stating:

That the machine has been locked against voting and sealed;

The number, as shown on the public counter;

The number on the seal which they have placed upon the machine;

The number registered on the protective counter or device; and

The number or other designation of the voting machine,

which certificate shall be returned by the chief manager to the superintendent with the other certificates, as provided in this part.

The poll officers shall then compare the number, as shown by the public counter of the machine, with the number of names appearing on the numbered list of voters, the electors list, and voter’s certificates, which shall then be placed in separate packages, containers, or envelopes and sealed.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1325, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1331, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 27; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Interfering with poll officers, §

21-2-569

.

21-2-455.
Canvass and return of votes.

If the type of voting machine provided shall require the counters to be seen in order to enable the poll officers to canvass the vote, the poll officers, in the presence of all persons within the polling place, shall then make visible the registering counters and, for that purpose, shall unlock and open the doors, or other covering concealing the same, giving full view of all the counter numbers. If the voting machine is equipped with a mechanism for printing paper proof sheets the poll officers shall immediately print not less than four proof sheets and as many more as may be requested by those present, to the extent of the machine’s capacity. The chief manager and an assistant manager shall then, under the scrutiny of the other assistant manager, and in the order of the offices as their titles are arranged on the machine, read from the counters or from one of the proof sheets, as the case may be, and announce, in distinct tones, the designation or designating number and letter on each counter for each candidate’s name, the result as shown by the counter numbers, the votes recorded for each office for persons other than nominated candidates, and the designation or designating numbers and letters on each counter, and the results as shown by the counter numbers for and against each question voted on. The counters shall not be read consecutively along the party or body rows or columns but shall always be read along the office columns or rows, completing the canvass for each office or question before proceeding to the next.

The vote as registered shall be entered by the poll officers, in ink, on duplicate return sheets and also on a general return sheet and statement, all of which, after the canvass is completed, shall be signed by the poll officers. If any poll officer shall refuse to sign or certify the general or duplicate return sheets or statement, he or she shall write his or her reasons therefor upon such sheets. The vote for presidential electors shall be computed and returned as provided in subsection (e) of Code Section 21-2-452. If more than one voting machine is used in any precinct, the vote registered on each machine shall be ascertained in like manner and separately entered in appropriate spaces on the general and duplicate return sheets and statement. The total vote cast for each candidate and for and against each question shall then be computed and entered on the general and duplicate return sheets and statement. There shall also be entered on the general return sheet and statement the number of electors who have voted, as shown by the numbered list of voters, electors list, and voter’s certificates, and the number on each machine, as shown by the public counters. The number registered on the protective counter or device on each machine immediately prior to the opening of the polls and immediately after the closing thereof and sealing of the machine and the number or other designation of each machine used shall also be entered thereon. In the case of primaries, duplicate return sheets shall be prepared as for other elections. The registering counters of the voting machine or the paper proof sheets, as the case may be, shall remain exposed to view until the said returns and all other reports have been fully completed and checked by the poll officers. During such time, anyone who may desire to be present shall be admitted to the polling place.

The proclamation of the result of the votes cast shall be announced distinctly and audibly by the chief manager, who shall read the name of each candidate, the designation or designating numbers and letters of his or her counters, and the vote registered on each counter, as well as the vote cast for and against each question submitted. During such proclamation, ample opportunity shall be given to any person lawfully present to compare the results so announced with the counter dials of the machine or with the paper proof sheets, as the case may be, and any necessary corrections shall then and there be made by the poll officers, after which the doors or other cover of the voting machine shall be closed and locked. Any ballots written, deposited, or affixed in or upon the voting machine shall be enclosed in properly sealed packages and properly endorsed and shall be delivered by the chief manager as provided in this part. The chief manager shall promptly deliver to the superintendent or his or her representative the keys of the voting machine, enclosed in a sealed envelope, if the construction of the voting machine shall permit their separate return. Such envelope shall have endorsed thereon a certificate of the poll officers stating the number of the machine, the precinct where it has been used, the number on the seal, and the number on the protective counter or device at the close of the polls.

The poll officers, on the returns provided for in this Code section, shall record any votes which have been cast by means of a write-in ballot for a person whose name is not printed on the ballot labels. In returning any such votes which have been written, deposited, or affixed upon receptacles or devices provided for the purpose, the poll officers shall record any such names exactly as they were written, deposited, or affixed.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1326, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1332, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 28; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-456.
Form of general return sheet, duplicate return sheets, and statement; posting of vote results; delivery of documents to superintendent; seal and return of electors list upon completion of vote count and tabulation.

The general return sheets, duplicate return sheets, and statement shall be printed to conform with the type of voting machine used and in form approved by the Secretary of State. The designating number and letter, if any, on the counter for each candidate shall be printed thereon opposite the candidate’s name. Immediately after the vote has been ascertained, the statement thereof shall be posted on the door of the polling place. Duplicate return sheets, voter’s certificates, numbered list of voters, oaths of poll officers, and affidavits of voters and others shall be sealed and given to the chief manager, who shall deliver them, together with the general return sheet and the package of ballots deposited, written, or affixed in or upon the voting machine, to the superintendent. The voter’s certificates, rejected voter’s certificates, and oaths of assisted voters shall be sealed in a separate envelope addressed to the board of registrars and bearing a list of its contents on the outside. This envelope shall be immediately delivered by the managers into the custody of the superintendent. If the type of voting machine is equipped with a mechanism for printing paper proof sheets, one of such proof sheets shall be posted on the door of the polling place with such statement; one shall be returned with a precinct return sheet sealed in an envelope prepared for the Secretary of State; one shall be placed in the envelope and delivered with the general return sheet; and one shall be sealed in the envelope with the duplicate return sheets and delivered by the chief manager to the superintendent. The printed proof sheet returned with the general return sheet and the printed proof sheet returned with the duplicate return sheet shall each be part of the return of the primary or election.

Immediately upon the completion of the count and tabulation of the vote cast, the electors list shall be sealed and returned immediately by the chief manager to the superintendent, who shall transmit it to the registrars.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1327, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1333, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 29; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 26; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-457.
Removal, storage, and examination of voting machines after completion of vote count.

As soon as possible after the completion of the count in precincts in which voting machines are used, the superintendent shall have the voting machines removed to the place of storage provided for in this chapter. The voting machines shall remain locked against voting for the period of ten days next following each primary and election, and as much longer as may be necessary or advisable because of any existing or threatened contest over the result of the primary or election, with due regard for the date of the next following primary or election, except that they may be opened and all the data and figures therein examined under this chapter, by order of any superior court of competent jurisdiction, or by direction of any legislative committee to investigate and report upon contested primaries or elections affected by the use of such machines. Such data and such figures shall be examined by such committee in the presence of the officer having the custody of such machines.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 413, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1332, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1334, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 36; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.